Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.56.120

Petition—Where filed.

Any person making a charge shall file it with the elections officer whose duty it is to receive and file a declaration of candidacy for the office concerning the incumbent of which the recall is to be demanded. The officer with whom the charge is filed shall promptly (1) serve a copy of the charge upon the officer whose recall is demanded, and (2) certify and transmit the charge to the preparer of the ballot synopsis provided in RCW 29A.56.130. The manner of service shall be the same as for the commencement of a civil action in superior court.

[ 2003 c 111 s 1408. Prior: 1984 c 170 s 2; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 47 s 2; 1965 c 9 s 29.82.015; prior: 1913 c 146 s 2; RRS s 5351. Formerly RCW 29.82.010, part. Formerly RCW 29.82.015.]

NOTES:

Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 47: See note following RCW 29A.56.110.